Massachusetts, session 194th, S438.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 official edition, is amended by 
adding the following new section:- 
Section 100. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the 
following meanings: 
“college and career pathway program”, a high school based program, designated by the 
department of elementary and secondary education, which offers a sequenced and/or career-
themed set of academic and/or work-based learning experiences, including designated early 
college programs, vocational-technical education programs, innovation pathways programs, and 
STEM tech career academies which can lead to, in the department’s opinion, improved college 
and career readiness outcomes.  
“individual learning plan”, a plan devised by individual students with assistance from a 
designated educator that provides a clear and detailed student academic pathway from secondary 

of 3 13 to post- secondary education or career with regard to coursework, sequencing and experiences 
beyond the classroom, beginning in the ninth grade or earlier.  
“MyCAP”, an acronym for My Career and Academic Plan, a process for creating a 
student’s individual learning plan as defined in this subsection, and supported by utilization of an 
online platform,  
(b) All public school districts shall ensure that all high school students, beginning in the 
ninth grade, have developed, with the support of a designated educator and an online platform 
approved by the department of elementary and secondary education, an individual learning plan 
as defined in subsection a of this section. Said plans shall allow students to continue to adapt said 
plans and to make reasonable and relevant changes to their plans through the course of their 
secondary education that allow for a continuing process of alignment with the student’s needs 
and planning goals. Districts will provide support to students to participate in the development 
and refinement of their plans. Districts will also make every reasonable effort to offer students 
the experiences identified in their plans to ensure alignment with, and accomplishment of, the 
student’s goals for post-graduate success.  
(c) Nothing contained herein will prevent districts from beginning the process of having 
students develop individual learning plans prior to beginning high school, for students within 
their jurisdictions.  
(d) Districts shall report annually to the department of elementary and secondary 
education on their progress in meeting the requirements contained in this section.  
(e) The department of elementary and secondary education shall develop guidance for 
districts to oversee and ensure their compliance with the provisions of this section, aligned with 

of 3 35 their current guidance to districts utilizing the structure of the MyCAP system and its component 
parts. 
(f) This section will take effect on September 1, 2028.